Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1111.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2061XC (3) 91 je/js S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 96.5, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 1 following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 15. Short-term employment with fixed end 3 date. If the department finds that the individual became 4 separated from employment due to the conclusion of employment 5 of a fixed period of one hundred eighty days or less, provided 6 the department also finds all of the following: 7 a. That the individual entered into a written employment 8 contract with the employer prior to the date on which the 9 employment began. 10 b. That the contract specified the end date of the 11 employment, which was no more than one hundred eighty days 12 after the beginning date. 13 c. That the contract acknowledged that the individual 14 would not be eligible for benefits upon the conclusion of the 15 employment. 16 d. That the employment actually concluded no more than one 17 hundred eighty days after the beginning date. 18 e. That the employer is not entering into such contracts 19 with the individual on an ongoing basis in order to avoid or 20 reduce liability under this chapter. 21 f. That the employment was not on federal active duty, state 22 active duty, or national guard duty, as defined in section 23 29A.1. 24 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to employment 25 beginning on or after the effective date of this Act. 26